North Carolina, session 2025, SB960.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-111.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.05. Funding for children with disabilities.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board shall allocate funds
for children with disabilities to each local school administrative unit on a per child basis. Each
local school administrative unit shall receive funds for the lesser of (i) all children who are
identified as children with disabilities or (ii) thirteen sixteen percent (13%) (16%) of its allotted
average daily membership in the local school administrative unit for the current school year."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eighty-two million eight hundred thousand dollars ($82,800,000)
in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for funding for children with
disabilities.
SECTION 2.(a) Part 1F of Article 9 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-111.11. High-Cost Disabilities Support Fund.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall maintain a High-Cost Disabilities Support
Fund (HCDSF) to be used to provide funds to local school administrative units and charter
schools for the extraordinary costs associated with educating children with disabilities who
require intensive and specialized services. The Department shall allocate funds for the following
purposes:
*S960-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) To provide additional State reimbursement for students whose special
education services exceed a cost threshold determined by the State Board of
Education.
(2) To help districts support students with complex needs while maintaining
stability in local budgets.
(3) To ensure that districts do not incur undue financial hardship for serving
students requiring the most intensive services.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules governing the use of funds from the
HCDSF consistent with the requirements of this section, including at least the following:
(1) Eligibility to receive funds.
(2) Reimbursement thresholds for specific uses of funds.
(3) Reporting requirements for uses of funds."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in recurring funds beginning
with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the purposes set out in G.S. 115C-111.11, as enacted
by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to funds allocated
for children with disabilities beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 960-First Edition